zh-CN: 适用琴弦长度: 上低音; 超长有效弦长; 长有效弦长; 短有效弦长; 标准/常规有效弦长; 其他
hu: Kompatibilis skálahossz: Bariton; Extra hosszú menzúra; Hosszú menzúra; Rövid menzúra; Normál/szabványos menzúra; Egyéb
ru: Совместимая мензура: Баритон; Экстра-длинная мензура; Длинная мензура; Короткая мензура; Стандартная/обычная мензура; Другое
ro-RO: Lungime compatibilă a scalei: Bariton; Scală foarte lungă; Scală lungă; Scală scurtă; Scală standard/obișnuită; Altele
pt-BR: Comprimento de escala compatível: Barítono; Escala extralonga; Escala longa; Escala curta; Escala padrão/regular; Outro
bg-BG: Съвместима дължина на мензурата: Баритон; Изключително дълга мензура; Дълга мензура; Къса мензура; Стандартна/обикновена мензура; Друга
fr: Longueur de diapason compatible: Baryton; Diapason extra long; Diapason long; Diapason court; Diapason standard/régulier; Autre
nl: Compatibele schaallengte: Bariton; Extra lange mensuur; Lange mensuur; Korte mensuur; Standaard mensuur; Overige
da: Kompatibel skalalængde: Baryton; Ekstra lang skala; Lang skala; Kort skala; Standard/almindelig skala; Andet
sv: Kompatibel skalelängd: Baryton; Extra lång mensur; Lång mensur; Kort mensur; Standard/vanlig mensur; Övrigt
lt-LT: Suderinamo ilgio menzūra: Baritoninė; Ypač ilga menzūra; Ilga menzūra; Trumpa menzūra; Standartinė / įprasta menzūra; Kita
tr: Uyumlu skala uzunluğu: Bariton; Ekstra uzun ölçek; Uzun ölçek; Kısa ölçek; Standart/normal ölçek; Diğer
ja: 対応スケール長さ: バリトン; エクストラロングスケール; ロングスケール; ショートスケール; スタンダード/レギュラースケール; その他
el: Συμβατό μήκος κλίμακας: Βαρύτονο; Πολύ μακριά κλίμακα; Μακριά κλίμακα; Κοντή κλίμακα; Τυπική/κανονική κλίμακα; Άλλο
de: Kompatible Saitenlänge: Bariton; Extra Long Scale; Long Scale; Short Scale; Standard-Mensur; Sonstige
cs: Kompatibilní délka menzury: Barytonová; Extra dlouhá menzura; Dlouhá menzura; Krátká menzura; Standardní/běžná menzura; Jiné
pl: Zgodna długość skali: Barytonowa; Ekstra długa menzura; Długa menzura; Krótka menzura; Standardowa menzura; Inne
ko: 호환 스케일 길이: 바리톤; 엑스트라 롱 스케일; 롱 스케일; 숏 스케일; 표준/레귤러 스케일; 기타
sl-SI: Združljiva dolžina menzure: Bariton; Zelo dolga menzura; Dolga menzura; Kratka menzura; Standardna/običajna menzura; Drugo
zh-TW: 相容有效弦長: 上低音; 特長弦長; 長弦長; 短弦長; 標準/一般弦長; 其他
vi: Chiều dài thang âm tương thích: Baritone; Cần cực dài (Extra-long scale); Cần dài (Long scale); Cần ngắn (Short scale); Tiêu chuẩn/Thường; Khác
pt-PT: Comprimento de escala compatível: Barítono; Escala extralonga; Escala longa; Escala curta; Escala padrão/normal; Outra
fi: Yhteensopiva mensuuripituus: Baritoni; Erittäin pitkä skaala; Pitkä skaala; Lyhyt skaala; Vakio/normaali skaala; Muu
hr-HR: Kompatibilna duljina skale: Bariton; Vrlo duga skala; Duga skala; Kratka skala; Standardna/obična skala; Ostalo
en: Compatible scale length: Baritone; Extra-long scale; Long scale; Short scale; Standard/Regular scale; Other
nb: Kompatibel skalalengde: Baryton; Ekstra lang mensur; Lang mensur; Kort mensur; Standard / vanlig mensur; Annet
es: Largo de escala compatible: Barítono; Escala extralarga; Escala larga; Escala corta; Escala estándar/normal; Otro
it: Lunghezza della scala compatibile: Baritono; Scala extra lunga; Scala lunga; Scala corta; Scala standard/regolare; Altro
th: ความยาวสเกลที่เข้ากันได้: บาริโทน; สเกลยาวพิเศษ; สเกลยาว; สเกลสั้น; สเกลมาตรฐาน/ทั่วไป; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Kompatibilná dĺžka menzúry: Barytón; Extra dlhá menzúra; Dlhá menzúra; Krátka menzúra; Štandardná/bežná menzúra; Iné